src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1E-shyyqkhkh_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - šââʹǩǩ: # Noun 1E-stem 'pig/sika' - full paradigm
# 
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: šââʹǩǩ
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: šââʹjj
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: šââʹjj
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: šâkka
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: šââʹjjest
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: šõõʹjjin
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Ess: šââʹǩǩen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Par: šââʹǩǩed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: [šââʹjjtaa, šââʹjjtää]
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: šââʹjj
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: šõõʹjji
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: šõõʹjjid
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: šõõʹjjid
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: šõõʹjjin
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: šõõʹjjivuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: [šõõʹjjitaa, šõõʹjjitää]

##
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: šââkkam
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: šââkkad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: šââʹǩǩes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: šââʹǩǩem
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: šââʹǩǩed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: šââʹǩǩez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: šââkkan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: šââǥǥad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: šââʹjjes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: šââʹǩǩen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: šââʹjjed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: šââʹjjez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: šââkkan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: šââǥǥad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: šââʹjjes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: šââʹǩǩen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: šââʹjjed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: šââʹjjez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: šâkksan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: šâkksad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: šâkkses
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: šâkkseen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: šâkkseed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: šâkkseez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: šâʹjstan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: šâʹjstad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: šâʹjstes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: šâʹjsteen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: šâʹjsteed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: šâʹjsteez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: šõõʹjjinan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: šõõʹjjinad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: šõõʹjjines
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: šõõʹjjineen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: šõõʹjjineed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: šõõʹjjineez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: šââkkantää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: šââǥǥadtää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: šââʹjjestää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: šââʹǩǩentää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: šââʹjjedtää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: šââʹjjeztää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxSg1: šâʹǩǩnan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxSg2: šâʹǩǩnad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxSg3: šâʹǩǩnes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxPl1: šâʹǩǩneen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxPl2: šâʹǩǩneed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxPl3: šâʹǩǩneez
#
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: šââkkan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: šââǥǥad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: šââʹjjes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: šââʹǩǩen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: šââʹjjed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: šââʹjjez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: šõõʹjjään
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: šõõʹjjääd
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: šõõʹjjees
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: šõõʹjjeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: šõõʹjjeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: šõõʹjjeez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: šõõʹjjään
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: šõõʹjjääd
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: šõõʹjjees
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: šõõʹjjeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: šõõʹjjeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: šõõʹjjeez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: šõõʹjjään
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: šõõʹjjääd
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: šõõʹjjees
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: šõõʹjjeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: šõõʹjjeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: šõõʹjjeez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: šõõʹjjinan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: šõõʹjjinad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: šõõʹjjines
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: šõõʹjjineen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: šõõʹjjineed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: šõõʹjjineez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: šõõʹjjäänvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: šõõʹjjäädvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: šõõʹjjeesvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: šõõʹjjeenvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: šõõʹjjeedvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: šõõʹjjeezvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: šõõʹjjääntää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: šõõʹjjäädtää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: šõõʹjjeestää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: šõõʹjjeentää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: šõõʹjjeedtää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: šõõʹjjeeztää
#
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: šââǥǥaž
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: šââǥǥa
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: šââǥǥa
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: šââǥǥʼže
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: šââǥǥast
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: šââǥǥain
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [šââǥǥataa, šââǥǥatää]
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: šââǥǥʼžen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: šââǥǥʼžed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: šââǥǥa
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: šââǥǥai
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: šââǥǥaid
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: šââǥǥaid
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: šââǥǥain
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: šââǥǥaivuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [šââǥǥaitaa, šââǥǥaitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: šââǥǥžam
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: šââǥǥžad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: šââǥǥžes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: šââǥǥžeem
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: šââǥǥžeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: šââǥǥžeez
     
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: šââǥǥžan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: šââǥǥžad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: šââǥǥžes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: šââǥǥžeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: šââǥǥžeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: šââǥǥžeez
     
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: šââǥǥžan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: šââǥǥžad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: šââǥǥžes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: šââǥǥžeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: šââǥǥžeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: šââǥǥžeez

     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: šââǥǥžasan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: šââǥǥžasad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: šââǥǥžasas
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: šââǥǥžeʹsen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: šââǥǥžeʹsed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: šââǥǥžeʹsez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: šâǥstan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: šâǥstad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: šâǥstes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: šâǥsteen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: šâǥsteed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: šâǥsteez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: šââǥǥainan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: šââǥǥainad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: šââǥǥaines
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: šââǥǥaineen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: šââǥǥaineed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: šââǥǥaineez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: šââǥǥʼžantää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: šââǥǥʼžadtää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: šââǥǥʼžestää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: šââǥǥʼžeentää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: šââǥǥʼžeedtää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: šââǥǥʼžeeztää

#     
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: šââǥǥʼžan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: šââǥǥʼžad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: šââǥǥʼžes
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: šââǥǥʼžeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: šââǥǥʼžeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: šââǥǥʼžeez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: šââǥǥään
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: šââǥǥääd
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: šââǥǥees
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: šââǥǥeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: šââǥǥeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: šââǥǥeez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: šââǥǥään
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: šââǥǥääd
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: šââǥǥees
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: šââǥǥeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: šââǥǥeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: šââǥǥeez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: šââǥǥään
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: šââǥǥääd
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: šââǥǥees
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: šââǥǥeen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: šââǥǥeed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: šââǥǥeez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: šââǥǥainan
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: šââǥǥainad
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: šââǥǥaines
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: šââǥǥaineen
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: šââǥǥaineed
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: šââǥǥaineez
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: šââǥǥäänvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: šââǥǥäädvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: šââǥǥeesvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: šââǥǥeenvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: šââǥǥeedvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: šââǥǥeezvuiʹm
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: šââǥǥääntää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: šââǥǥäädtää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: šââǥǥeestää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: šââǥǥeentää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: šââǥǥeedtää
     šââʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: šââǥǥeeztää
